North Carolina, session 2025, HB551.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental
Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services (DMH/DD/SUS), shall develop
and implement a plan for a statewide reimbursement methodology for State funded behavioral
health services provided to adults with a severe and persistent mental illness diagnosis who are
served by a Clubhouse model psychosocial rehabilitation day program. The plan shall include all
of the following:
(1) Incentives for clubhouses to become accredited by Clubhouse International.
(2) Consistent application of rates throughout regions served by local
management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs).
(3) Education and training for LME/MCO staff and relevant staff within the
Department of Health and Human Services on the Clubhouse model and its
use in serving individuals with severe and persistent mental illness in this
State.
(4) A new service definition.
SECTION 1.(b) No later than June 1, 2026, DMH/DD/SUS shall submit a report to
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services that contains all of the
following information related to the plan required by subsection (a) of this section:
(1) The proposed reimbursement methodology.
(2) A proposed time line for implementation for the reimbursement methodology.
(3) Any costs associated with implementation of the reimbursement
methodology.
(4) Details on the education and training developed for LME/MCOs and staff of
the Department of Health and Human Services.
(5) Details pertaining to lifting barriers to accessing services and lifting
burdensome service requirements.
(6) Any new service definitions created pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental
Disabilities, and Substance Use Services, the sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to implement the plan
*H551-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
under Section 1 of this act and provide funding for Clubhouse International (CI) accredited
member Clubhouses for current programs, expansion of services or locations served,
accreditation costs of a Clubhouse, or staff and Clubhouse member training and professional
development.
SECTION 3. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits, shall, to the extent allowable under G.S. 108A-54.1A, provide Medicaid coverage for
services included in the plan developed by DMH/DD/SUS pursuant to Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 551-First Edition